Massachusetts, session 194th, H2392.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Section 4 of chapter 38 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
If the medical examiner takes jurisdiction pursuant to this section, the medical examiner 
shall conduct an autopsy on the body of such deceased person and provide an autopsy report to 
anyone legally entitled to receive it within 90 days of the date that the medical examiner took 
jurisdiction, except if the medical examiner provides a notice of delay to anyone legally entitled 
to receive the autopsy report with the date the autopsy report will be complete and the reason for 
the delay. 
(b) Not later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the medical examiner shall 
submit to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, and the joint committee on 
public health, a report, including, but not limited to:   

of 2 12  (i) the number of autopsies completed within 90 days of the date that the medical 
examiner took jurisdiction;  
(ii) the number of autopsies that were not completed within 90 days of the date that the 
medical examiner took jurisdiction; and  
(iii) the reasoning behind why the autopsies were not completed within said 90 days of 
the date that the medical examiner took jurisdiction.